Utah statutes.
20A-1-501.   Candidate vacancies -- Procedure for filling.

(1)  The state central committee of a political party, for candidates for United States senator, United States representative, governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, state treasurer, and state auditor, and for legislative candidates whose legislative districts encompass more than one county, and the county central committee of a political party, for all other party candidates seeking an office elected at a regular general election, may certify the name of another candidate to the appropriate election officer if:

(a)  after the close of the period for filing declarations of candidacy and continuing through the date 15 days before the date of the primary election:

(i)  only one or two candidates from that party have filed a declaration of candidacy for that office; and

(ii)  one or both:

(A)  dies;

(B)  resigns because of acquiring a physical or mental disability, certified by a physician, that prevents the candidate from continuing the candidacy; or

(C)  is disqualified by an election officer for improper filing or nominating procedures; or

(b)  after the close of the primary election and continuing through the date of the voter registration deadline for the general election as established in Section 20A-2-102.5, the party's candidate:

(i)  dies;

(ii)  resigns because of acquiring a physical or mental disability as certified by a physician;

(iii)  is disqualified by an election officer for improper filing or nominating procedures; or

(iv)  resigns to become a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States.

(2)  If no more than two candidates from a political party have filed a declaration of candidacy for an office elected at a regular general election and one resigns to become the party candidate for another position, the state central committee of that political party, for candidates for governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, state treasurer, and state auditor, and for legislative candidates whose legislative districts encompass more than one county, and the county central committee of that political party, for all other party candidates, may certify the name of another candidate to the appropriate election officer.

(3)  Each replacement candidate shall file a declaration of candidacy as required by Title 20A, Chapter 9, Part 2, Candidate Qualifications and Declarations of Candidacy.

(4)  A replacement candidate may not be certified for an election during the period beginning on the day after the date of the voter registration deadline and continuing through the date of the election.

